Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2047
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Payment of expenses.

A corporation may pay the expenses of selling or underwriting its shares and of organizing or reorganizing the corporation from the consideration received for shares.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 47.